ani_demonstratives.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# PRONOUNS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS
PronounsAbs
PronounsDemOblStem [>:>] [<obl><m>:ш] [>:>] Inflection[-f,-vowel_morpheme,-n.m.sg]
PronounsDemOblStem [>:>] [<obl><m>:шу] [>:>] Inflection[-f,vowel_morpheme]
PronounsDemOblStem [>:>] [<obl><m><pl>:лу] [>:>] Inflection[-f]
PronounsDemOblStem [>:>] [<obl><nm>:л] [>:>] Inflection[-m,-vowel_morpheme]
PronounsDemOblStem [>:>] [<obl><nm>:ллъи] [>:>] Inflection[-m,vowel_morpheme]
PronounsDemOblStem [>:>] [<obl><m><pl>:ли] [>:>] Inflection[-m]

LEXICON PronounsAbs
гьоб<PRON>><m>:гьо>в                                         # proximal
гьоб<PRON>><f>:гьо>й                                         # proximal
гьоб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьо>б                                     # proximal
гьоб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьо>й                                     # proximal
гьоб<PRON>><inan1>:гьо>б                                     # proximal
гьоб<PRON>><inan2>:гьо>р                                     # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><m>><m>:гьово>в                                  # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><f>><f>:гьойо>й                                  # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><an><sg>><an><sg>:гьобо>б                          # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><an><pl>><an><pl>:гьойо>й                          # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><inan1>><inan1>:гьобо>б                          # proximal
гьобоб<PRON><inan2>><inan2>:гьоро>р                          # proximal
гьоноб<PRON>><m>:гьоно>в                                     # proximal
гьоноб<PRON>><f>:гьоно>й                                     # proximal
гьоноб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьоно>б                                 # proximal
гьоноб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьоно>й                                 # proximal
гьоноб<PRON>><inan1>:гьоно>б                                 # proximal
гьоноб<PRON>><inan2>:гьоно>р                                 # proximal
гьеб<PRON>><m>:гье>в                                         # medial
гьеб<PRON>><f>:гье>й                                         # medial
гьеб<PRON>><an><sg>:гье>б                                     # medial
гьеб<PRON>><an><pl>:гье>й                                     # medial
гьеб<PRON>><inan1>:гье>б                                     # medial
гьеб<PRON>><inan2>:гье>р                                     # medial
гьебеб<PRON><m>><m>:гьеве>в                                  # medial
гьебеб<PRON><f>><f>:гьейе>й                                  # medial
гьебеб<PRON><an><sg>><an><sg>:гьебе>б                          # medial
гьебеб<PRON><an><pl>><an><pl>:гьейе>й                          # medial
гьебеб<PRON><inan1>><inan1>:гьебе>б                          # medial
гьебеб<PRON><inan2>><inan2>:гьере>р                          # medial
гьенеб<PRON>><m>:гьене>в                                     # medial
гьенеб<PRON>><f>:гьене>й                                     # medial
гьенеб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьене>б                                 # medial
гьенеб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьене>й                                 # medial
гьенеб<PRON>><inan1>:гьене>б                                 # medial
гьенеб<PRON>><inan2>:гьене>р                                 # medial
гьедеб<PRON>><m>:гьеде>в                                     # distal
гьедеб<PRON>><f>:гьеде>й                                     # distal
гьедеб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьеде>б                                 # distal
гьедеб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьеде>й                                 # distal
гьедеб<PRON>><inan1>:гьеде>б                                 # distal
гьедеб<PRON>><inan2>:гьеде>р                                 # distal
гьегеб<PRON>><lower>><m>:гье>ге>в                            # distal
гьегеб<PRON>><lower>><f>:гье>ге>й                            # distal
гьегеб<PRON>><lower>><an><sg>:гье>ге>б                        # distal
гьегеб<PRON>><lower>><an><pl>:гье>ге>й                        # distal
гьегеб<PRON>><lower>><inan1>:гье>ге>б                        # distal
гьегеб<PRON>><lower>><inan2>:гье>ге>р                        # distal
гьелъеб<PRON>><upper>><m>:гье>лъе>в                          # distal
гьелъеб<PRON>><upper>><f>:гье>лъе>й                          # distal
гьелъеб<PRON>><upper>><an><sg>:гье>лъе>б                      # distal
гьелъеб<PRON>><upper>><an><pl>:гье>лъе>й                      # distal
гьелъеб<PRON>><upper>><inan1>:гье>лъе>б                      # distal
гьелъеб<PRON>><upper>><inan2>:гье>лъе>р                      # distal
гьендеб<PRON>><m>:гьенде>в                                   # distal
гьендеб<PRON>><f>:гьенде>й                                   # distal
гьендеб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьенде>б                               # distal
гьендеб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьенде>й                               # distal
гьендеб<PRON>><inan1>:гьенде>б                               # distal
гьендеб<PRON>><inan2>:гьенде>р                               # distal
гьенедеб<PRON>><m>:гьенеде>в                                 # distal
гьенедеб<PRON>><f>:гьенеде>й                                 # distal
гьенедеб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьенеде>б                             # distal
гьенедеб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьенеде>й                             # distal
гьенедеб<PRON>><inan1>:гьенеде>б                             # distal
гьенедеб<PRON>><inan2>:гьенеде>р                             # distal
гьундеб<PRON>><m>:гьунде>в                                   # distal
гьундеб<PRON>><f>:гьунде>й                                   # distal
гьундеб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьунде>б                               # distal
гьундеб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьунде>й                               # distal
гьундеб<PRON>><inan1>:гьунде>б                               # distal
гьундеб<PRON>><inan2>:гьунде>р                               # distal
гьунгоб<PRON>><lower>><m>:гьун>го>в                          # distal
гьунгоб<PRON>><lower>><f>:гьун>го>й                          # distal
гьунгоб<PRON>><lower>><an><sg>:гьун>го>б                      # distal
гьунгоб<PRON>><lower>><an><pl>:гьун>го>й                      # distal
гьунгоб<PRON>><lower>><inan1>:гьун>го>б                      # distal
гьунгоб<PRON>><lower>><inan2>:гьун>го>р                      # distal
гьунлъоб<PRON>><upper>><m>:гьун>лъо>в                        # distal
гьунлъоб<PRON>><upper>><f>:гьун>лъо>й                        # distal
гьунлъоб<PRON>><upper>><an><sg>:гьун>лъо>б                    # distal
гьунлъоб<PRON>><upper>><an><pl>:гьун>лъо>й                    # distal
гьунлъоб<PRON>><upper>><inan1>:гьун>лъо>б                    # distal
гьунлъоб<PRON>><upper>><inan2>:гьун>лъо>р                    # distal
гьунудоб<PRON>><m>:гьунудо>в                                 # distal
гьунудоб<PRON>><f>:гьунудо>й                                 # distal
гьунудоб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьунудо>б                             # distal
гьунудоб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьунудо>й                             # distal
гьунудоб<PRON>><inan1>:гьунудо>б                             # distal
гьунудоб<PRON>><inan2>:гьунудо>р                             # distal
гьунугоб<PRON>><lower>><m>:гьуну>го>в                        # distal
гьунугоб<PRON>><lower>><f>:гьуну>го>й                        # distal
гьунугоб<PRON>><lower>><an><sg>:гьуну>го>б                    # distal
гьунугоб<PRON>><lower>><an><pl>:гьуну>го>й                    # distal
гьунугоб<PRON>><lower>><inan1>:гьуну>го>б                    # distal
гьунугоб<PRON>><lower>><inan2>:гьуну>го>р                    # distal
гьунулъоб<PRON>><upper>><m>:гьуну>лъо>в                      # distal
гьунулъоб<PRON>><upper>><f>:гьуну>лъо>й                      # distal
гьунулъоб<PRON>><upper>><an><sg>:гьуну>лъо>б                  # distal
гьунулъоб<PRON>><upper>><an><pl>:гьуну>лъо>й                  # distal
гьунулъоб<PRON>><upper>><inan1>:гьуну>лъо>б                  # distal
гьунулъоб<PRON>><upper>><inan2>:гьуну>лъо>р                  # distal
гьидиб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьиди>б                                 # distal
гьидиб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьиди>й                                 # distal
гьидиб<PRON>><inan1>:гьиди>б                                 # distal
гьидиб<PRON>><inan2>:гьиди>р                                 # distal
гьигиб<PRON>><lower>><m>:гьи>ги>в                            # distal
гьигиб<PRON>><lower>><f>:гьи>ги>й                            # distal
гьигиб<PRON>><lower>><an><sg>:гьи>ги>б                        # distal
гьигиб<PRON>><lower>><an><pl>:гьи>ги>й                        # distal
гьигиб<PRON>><lower>><inan1>:гьи>ги>б                        # distal
гьигиб<PRON>><lower>><inan2>:гьи>ги>р                        # distal
гьилъиб<PRON>><upper>><m>:гьи>лъи>в                          # distal
гьилъиб<PRON>><upper>><f>:гьи>лъи>й                          # distal
гьилъиб<PRON>><upper>><an><sg>:гьи>лъи>б                      # distal
гьилъиб<PRON>><upper>><an><pl>:гьи>лъи>й                      # distal
гьилъиб<PRON>><upper>><inan1>:гьи>лъи>б                      # distal
гьилъиб<PRON>><upper>><inan2>:гьи>лъи>р                      # distal
гьиндиб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьинди>б                               # distal
гьиндиб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьинди>й                               # distal
гьиндиб<PRON>><inan1>:гьинди>б                               # distal
гьиндиб<PRON>><inan2>:гьинди>р                               # distal
гьингиб<PRON>><lower>><m>:гьин>ги>в                          # distal
гьингиб<PRON>><lower>><f>:гьин>ги>й                          # distal
гьингиб<PRON>><lower>><an><sg>:гьин>ги>б                      # distal
гьингиб<PRON>><lower>><an><pl>:гьин>ги>й                      # distal
гьингиб<PRON>><lower>><inan1>:гьин>ги>б                      # distal
гьингиб<PRON>><lower>><inan2>:гьин>ги>р                      # distal
гьинлъиб<PRON>><upper>><m>:гьин>лъи>в                        # distal
гьинлъиб<PRON>><upper>><f>:гьин>лъи>й                        # distal
гьинлъиб<PRON>><upper>><an><sg>:гьин>лъи>б                    # distal
гьинлъиб<PRON>><upper>><an><pl>:гьин>лъи>й                    # distal
гьинлъиб<PRON>><upper>><inan1>:гьин>лъи>б                    # distal
гьинлъиб<PRON>><upper>><inan2>:гьин>лъи>р                    # distal
гьинидиб<PRON>><an><sg>:гьиниди>б                             # distal
гьинидиб<PRON>><an><pl>:гьиниди>й                             # distal
гьинидиб<PRON>><inan1>:гьиниди>б                             # distal
гьинидиб<PRON>><inan2>:гьиниди>р                             # distal
гьинигиб<PRON>><lower>><m>:гьини>ги>в                        # distal
гьинигиб<PRON>><lower>><f>:гьини>ги>й                        # distal
гьинигиб<PRON>><lower>><an><sg>:гьини>ги>б                    # distal
гьинигиб<PRON>><lower>><an><pl>:гьини>ги>й                    # distal
гьинигиб<PRON>><lower>><inan1>:гьини>ги>б                    # distal
гьинигиб<PRON>><lower>><inan2>:гьини>ги>р                    # distal
гьинилъиб<PRON>><upper>><m>:гьини>лъи>в                      # distal
гьинилъиб<PRON>><upper>><f>:гьини>лъи>й                      # distal
гьинилъиб<PRON>><upper>><an><sg>:гьини>лъи>б                  # distal
гьинилъиб<PRON>><upper>><an><pl>:гьини>лъи>й                  # distal
гьинилъиб<PRON>><upper>><inan1>:гьини>лъи>б                  # distal
гьинилъиб<PRON>><upper>><inan2>:гьини>лъи>р                  # distal
